Virginia statutes. Title 44. Military and Emergency Laws.
Chapter 3.5. Virginia Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Program.

§ 44-146.34.
Purpose; definitions.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the development and implementation of a program to protect the environment and the health, safety, and welfare of the people of the Commonwealth from the threats and potential threats of accidents or incidents involving hazardous materials. This program shall be known as the Virginia Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Program.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:“Coordinator” means the Coordinator of the Department of Emergency Management.“Department” means the Department of Emergency Management.“Hazardous materials” means substances or materials which may pose unreasonable risks to health, safety, property, or the environment when used, transported, stored or disposed of, which may include materials which are solid, liquid or gas. Hazardous materials may include toxic substances, flammable and ignitable materials, explosives, corrosive materials, and radioactive materials and include (i) those substances or materials in a form or quantity which may pose an unreasonable risk to health, safety, or property when transported, and which the Secretary of Transportation of the United States has so designated by regulation or order; (ii) hazardous substances as defined or designated by law or regulation of the Commonwealth or law or regulation of the United States government; and (iii) hazardous waste as defined or designated by law or regulation of the Commonwealth.“Political subdivision” means any city or county in the Commonwealth, and for the purposes of this chapter, any town with a population of more than 5,000 which chooses to have an emergency management program separate from that of the county in which the town is located.“Transport” or “transportation” means any movement of property by any mode and any packing, loading, unloading, or storage incidental thereto.

History.

1987, c. 492; 2000, c. 309.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309, in subsection B, substituted “Emergency Management” for “Emergency Services” in the paragraphs defining “Coordinator,” “Department” and “Political subdivision.”

§ 44-146.35.
Powers and duties of the Department of Emergency Management.

In carrying out the purposes set forth in this chapter the Department shall have the authority to:

Coordinate the development of hazardous materials training programs and hazardous materials emergency response programs and plans with state and local government agencies and related groups. Those state agencies and local government agencies shall retain the statutory responsibilities assigned elsewhere in this Code.

Administer the implementation of the Virginia Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Program.

History.

1987, c. 492; 2000, c. 309; 2011, cc. 594, 681.

Cross references.

As to escheat of property with hazardous materials, §

55.1-2417

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 241, cl. 1 provides: “The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, the State Health Commissioner, and the State Coordinator of Emergency Management shall evaluate existing statutory and regulatory tools for ensuring that chemical storage in the Commonwealth is conducted in a manner that is protective of human health, public safety, drinking water resources, and the environment of the Commonwealth. This evaluation may include (i) an examination of Virginia’s existing programs to protect drinking water resources from contamination from chemical storage; (ii) identification of any existing gaps or inadequacy in drinking water protections related to chemical storage; (iii) identification of any existing gaps or inadequacy in chemical storage standards; (iv) any recommendations on chemical storage in the Commonwealth to address protection of human health, public safety, drinking water resources, the environment, and the economy of the Commonwealth; and (v) other policies and procedures that the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, the State Health Commissioner, and the State Coordinator of Emergency Management determine may enhance the protection of Virginia’s drinking water resources and the safe storage of chemicals in Virginia.

“The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, the State Health Commissioner, and the State Coordinator of Emergency Management shall report the findings of the evaluation to the State Water Commission, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Chairman of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources no later than December 1, 2016.

“For purposes of this section, ‘chemical storage’ means those chemicals identified by the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act (SARA) and the Emergency Planning and Community Right-To-Know Act (EPCRA) that provides for hazardous chemical storage reporting requirements in Section 312 of the SARA and are stored in excess of 10,000 gallons.”

Acts 2015, c. 241, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on January 1, 2017.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309 substituted “Emergency Management” for “Emergency Services“ in the section catchline.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 594 and 681 are identical, and deleted the last sentence in subdivision 2, which read: “The Department shall consider the recommendations of the Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Advisory Council in implementing the Program.”

§ 44-146.36.
Coordinator to enter into agreements with political subdivisions; immunity from liability.

The Coordinator may enter into agreements with political subdivisions to provide hazardous materials emergency response within a specific geographical area of the Commonwealth on a state and political subdivision cost-sharing basis. The cost-sharing agreements shall be negotiated with political subdivisions by the Coordinator.

Neither the Commonwealth, nor any political subdivision thereof, nor federal agencies, nor other public or private agencies, nor public or private employees, nor representatives of any of them, engaged in any emergency services activities while complying with or attempting to comply with this chapter or any regulation or executive order promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall be liable for the death of or injury to any person or damage to property as a result of such activities, except where such death, injury or damage results from gross negligence, recklessness or willful misconduct. The provisions of this section shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which he would otherwise be entitled under this chapter, or under the Workers’ Compensation Act (§

65.2-100

et seq.), or under any pension law, nor the right of any such person to receive any benefits or compensation under any act of Congress.

History.

1987, c. 492; 1989, c. 378.

§ 44-146.37.
Disbursements made from Virginia Disaster Response Fund.

Disbursements for costs and expenses, including, but not limited to equipment, material, hazardous materials emergency response operations and immediate accident or incident site cleanup costs and expenses in preventing or alleviating damage, loss, hardship, or suffering caused by accidents or incident, involving hazardous materials, shall be made from the Virginia Disaster Response Fund in accordance with the provisions of § 44-146.18:1.

The Coordinator shall promptly seek reimbursement from any party causing or contributing to an accident or incident involving hazardous materials for all sums disbursed from the Virginia Disaster Response Fund for the protection, relief, and recovery from loss or damage caused by such party.

The Coordinator is also authorized to recover any sums expended by any other state agency or political subdivision for preventing or alleviating damage, loss, hardship, or suffering caused by accidents or incidents involving hazardous materials. To recover such sums the Coordinator shall provide documentation that the costs were incurred whether or not they were actually disbursed from the Virginia Disaster Response Fund.

History.

1987, c. 492.

Law Review.

For article, “Environmental Liens and Title Insurance,” see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 305 (1989).

§ 44-146.38.
Political subdivisions to appoint hazardous materials coordinator.

Each political subdivision shall appoint a hazardous materials coordinator. In appointing the hazardous materials coordinator, political subdivisions shall consider the requisite qualifications for hazardous materials coordinators as established by the Coordinator. The hazardous materials coordinator shall coordinate the hazardous materials emergency response program within the political subdivision.

History.

1987, c. 492; 2011, cc. 594, 681.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 594 and 681 are identical, and deleted “upon recommendation of the State Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Advisory Council” from the end of the second sentence.

§ 44-146.39.
Repealed by Acts 2011, cc. 594 and 681, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 44-146.39, pertaining to the State Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Advisory Council, was derived from 1987, c. 492; 2000, c. 309.

§ 44-146.40.
Joint emergency planning committee; certain localities.

Any joint emergency planning committee serving Fairfax County and the City of Fairfax shall have the authority to require any facility within its emergency planning district to submit the information required and participate in the emergency planning provided for in Subtitle A of Title 3 of Public Law 99-499. For the purposes of this section, “facility” shall include any development or installation having an aggregate storage capacity of at least one million gallons of oil as defined in §

62.1-44.34:10

, or the potential for a sudden release of 10,000 pounds or more of any other flammable liquid or gas not exempt from the provisions of § 327 of Title 3 of Public Law 99-499. This requirement shall not occur until after public notice and the opportunity to comment. The committee shall notify the facility owner or operator of any requirement to comply with this section.

History.

1987, c. 492; 1992, cc. 633, 656; 1994, c. 691; 2007, c. 813; 2011, cc. 594, 681; 2017, c. 512.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 813, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the powers of any locality with respect to any ordinance, resolution or bylaw validly adopted and not repealed or rescinded prior to July 1, 2007.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813 substituted “Fairfax County and the City of Fairfax” for “any county operating under the urban county executive form of government and serving a city with a population between 19,500 and 20,000” in subsection G.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 594 and 681 are identical, and deleted subsection D, which read: “The Virginia Emergency Response Council shall seek advice on policy and programmatic matters from the Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Advisory Council” and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and in subsection D deleted “of Title 2.2” following “(§

2.2-4000

et seq.).”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 512 rewrote the section.